Washington statutes.
RCW 35.71.040

Plan—Alternate vehicle routes—Off-street parking—Hearing, notice.

Before a mall is established, a plan shall be formulated consistent with the city's comprehensive plan, including at least the area of the right-of-way between two intersecting streets and showing alternate routes outside the mall area upon which any vehicles excluded from using the mall may be accommodated; it may include a provision for on and off-street parking. After the plans have been prepared, the corporate authority shall hold a public hearing thereon, giving notice of time and place at least two weeks in advance of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the city and as required by *chapter 42.32 RCW.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.71.040. Prior: 1961 c 111 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The only section in chapter 42.32 RCW, RCW 42.32.030, was recodified as RCW 42.30.035 pursuant to 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 30.